Hawaii, session 2026, SB3173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established within the department of land and natural resources a three-year cultural training pilot program to be administered by the division of boating and ocean recreation to all commercial use permit holders and applicants operating in Lahaina harbor.  The division of boating and recreation shall partner with an organization identified by the office of Hawaiian affairs that specializes in Native Hawaiian culture and place-based history to teach a cultural training course to educate commercial use permit holders and applicants for commercial use permits on the cultural and historic significance of the area. (b) The organization teaching the cultural training course shall issue a certificate of completion to any person who completes the course.  All applicants for commercial use permits operating in Lahaina harbor shall submit a certificate of completion of the cultural training course with the permit application.  Existing commercial use permit holders operating in Lahaina shall complete the required cultural training course within six months of the establishment of the pilot program. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________